Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.070

Applicants—Eligibility for examination—Fee.

Any applicant for a license shall be examined if he or she pays an examination fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and certifies under oath that he or she:

(1) Is eighteen years or more of age; and

(2) Has graduated from an accredited high school; and

(3) Is of good moral character; and

(4) Has either:

(a) Had at least three years of apprenticeship training; or

(b) Successfully completed a prescribed course in opticianry in a college or university approved by the secretary; or

(c) Been principally engaged in practicing as a dispensing optician not in the state of Washington for five years.

[ 2004 c 262 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 76; 1985 c 7 s 29; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 34; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 22; 1957 c 43 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 262: See note following RCW 18.06.050.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.